tr: Başlık Tipi: Ortodonti; Standart; Geniş boyun; Diğer
fi: Nippatyyppi: Ortodonttinen; Tavallinen; Leveä kaula; Muu
th: ประเภทจุกนม: เพื่อการจัดฟัน; มาตรฐาน; ฐานกว้าง; อื่นๆ
da: Brystvortetype: Ortodontisk; Standard; Bred hals; Andet
es: Tipo de tetina: Ortodoncia; Estándar; Cuello ancho; Otros
lt-LT: Žinduko tipas: Ortodontinis; Standartinis; Platus kaklelis; Kita
ro-RO: Tip tetină: Ortodontică; Standard; Gât larg; Altele
it: Tipo di tettarella: Ortodontica; Standard; A collo ampio; Altro
nb: Nippeltype: Ortodontisk; Standard; Bred hals; Annet
zh-TW: 橡皮奶頭類型: 矯正式; 標準; 寬口式; 其他
hr-HR: Vrsta sisača: Ortodontski; Standardni; Širokog vrata; Ostalo
ja: 乳首の種類: 歯列矯正; スタンダード; ワイドネック; その他
cs: Typ savičky: Ortodontický; Standardní; Široký; Jiné
bg-BG: Тип биберони: Ортодонтска; Стандартна; Широк отвор; Други
sl-SI: Vrsta nastavka: Ortodontska; Standardna; Širok vrat; Drugo
pt-BR: Tipo de mamilo: Ortodôntico; Padrão; Pescoço largo; Outro
zh-CN: 奶嘴类型: 正畸; 标准; 宽口径; 其他
pl: Typ złączki wkrętnej: Ortodoncja; Standard; Szeroki dekolt; Inne
ru: Тип соски: Ортодонтический; Стандартный; Широкая горловина; Другой
pt-PT: Tipo de tetina: Ortodôntico; Padrão; Largo; Outro
hu: Cumi típusa: Fogszabályozós; Normál; Széles nyakú; Egyéb
fr: Type de tétine: Orthodontique; Standard; Col large; Autre
en: Nipple type: Orthodontic; Standard; Wide neck; Other
el: Τύπος θηλής: Ορθοδοντική; Κανονικό; Με φαρδύ στόμιο; Άλλο
sv: Typ av nippel: Ortodontisk; Standard; Vid hals; Övrigt
sk-SK: Typ cumlíka: Ortodontický; Štandardný; Široký krk; Iné
de: Saugertyp: Orthodontisch; Standard; Weiter Hals; Sonstiges
ko: 젖꼭지 유형: 교정; 표준; 넓은 목; 기타
vi: Loại núm vú: Chỉnh nha; Bánh xe tiêu chuẩn; Cổ rộng; Khác
nl: Speentype: Orthodontisch; Standaard; Brede hals; Andere